North Carolina statutes. Chapter 23. Debtor and Creditor.
Article 6. Practice in Insolvency and Certain Other Proceedings.

§ 23-46.
Unlawful to solicit claims of creditors in proceedings.

It shall be unlawful for any individual, corporation, or firm or other association of persons, to solicit of any creditor any claim of such creditor in order that such individual, corporation, firm or association may represent such creditor or present or vote such claim, in any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or in any action or proceeding for or growing out of the appointment of a receiver, or in any matter involving an assignment for the benefit of creditors.

History.

1931, c. 208, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to restrictions on appearance for creditor in insolvency proceedings, see

G.S. 84-9

.

Legal Periodicals.

See 9 N.C.L. Rev. 348 (1931).

§ 23-47.
Violation of preceding section a misdemeanor.

Any individual, corporation, or firm or other association of persons violating any provision of

G.S. 23-46

shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1931, c. 208, s. 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 399; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).